Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20259-1306
Operator; deduction from winnings payment; remittance; requirements.

(1) Beginning on the applicable implementation date designated by the Tax Commissioner pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of section 9-1312, prior to making a winnings payment and after the operator has checked the collection system as provided in section 9-1305, the operator shall deduct the amount of debt and outstanding state liability identified in the collection system from the winnings payment and shall remit the net winnings payment, if any, to the obligor and the amount deducted to the Department of Revenue in a manner prescribed by the department.

(2) If an operator determines that an obligor identified using the collection system is entitled to a winnings payment, the operator shall notify the Department of Revenue in a manner prescribed by the department that a balance of debt or outstanding state liability owed by the obligor is being remitted to the department.

(3) The Department of Revenue shall first credit any such winnings payment against any debt of such obligor certified by the Department of Health and Human Services until such debt is satisfied and then against any outstanding state liability owed by such obligor until such liability is satisfied on a pro rata basis.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 38;

Laws 2025, LB415, § 11.